Virginia statutes. Title 61.1. Warehouses, Cold Storage and Refrigerated Locker Plants.
Chapter 7. Handling and Sale of Burley Tobacco.

§ 61.1-57.
Enforcement by Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services; rules and regulations.

The Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall have authority to establish rules and regulations for the enforcement of this chapter. The Commissioner is hereby vested with the authority to administer and enforce the provisions of this law and to enforce reasonable rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions hereof, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-156; 1950, p. 66; 1968, c. 69.

§ 61.1-58.
Commingling burley and other tobacco; moving tobacco before sale.

It shall be unlawful for any person to commingle, mix, place in same basket with other tobacco or in any other manner or means to handle tobacco so as to lose its identity, for the purpose of sale at auction, loose-leaf tobacco grown by one producer with loose-leaf burley tobacco grown by any other producer, or of the same producer after being placed on the loose-leaf floor.

After tobacco is weighed and set upon the warehouse floor for sale no basket of tobacco shall be moved, without the consent of the owner, from its place on the floor until sale is confirmed by the owner of same. This shall not apply to official inspectors of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, who in the course of their duties find it necessary to move piles of tobacco.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-157; 1950, p. 66; 1968, c. 69.

§ 61.1-59.
Sales of burley tobacco.

Sales of burley tobacco at warehouses or loosefloors shall be conducted so as to conform to one of the following methods:

Sales to be at the rate of not more than 90,000 pounds per hour, per set of buyers, or

Sales to be at the rate of not more than 360 baskets per hour per set of buyers.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-158; 1950, p. 66; 1968, c. 69.

§ 61.1-60.
Information to be accurate and substantiated.

Any information pertaining to weights of tobacco sold, prices paid or amounts of tobacco handled, disseminated by any warehouseman, his employees or agents shall be accurate and substantiated by records kept at the warehouse or loosefloor.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-159; 1950, p. 67; 1968, c. 69.

§ 61.1-61.
Penalty for violation.

The violation of any provision of this law or valid rules and regulations promulgated hereunder shall constitute a misdemeanor and shall be punishable by fine of not less than $50 for the first offense and for each subsequent offense shall be punished by a fine of not less than $500 or imprisonment in jail not less than thirty days, or both such fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court or jury.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-160; 1950, p. 67; 1968, c. 69.